Hawaii statutes.
[§328-118] Injunctive relief. The
director may institute a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction
for injunctive relief to prevent any violation of this part or any rule adopted
under this part. The court shall have powers to grant relief in accordance
with the Hawaii rules of civil procedure. [L 1992, c 196, pt of §2]

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next